Colorado, session 2026A, HB1320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-106, amend
(3)(b), (3)(e), (3)(f), (3)(g)(I), and (3)(h); and add (3)(h.5) as follows:
1-40-106. Title board - meetings - ballot title - initiative and
referendum - definitions - rules.
(3) (b) (I) In setting a title, the title board shall consider the public
confusion that might be caused by misleading titles and shall, whenever
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

practicable, avoid titles for which the general understanding of the effect of
a "yes/for" or "no/against" vote will be unclear. The title for the proposed
law or constitutional amendment, which shall MUST correctly and fairly
express the true intent and meaning thereof, together with the ballot title and
submission clause, shall MUST be completed, except as otherwise required
by section 1-40-107, within two weeks after the first meeting of the title
board. Immediately upon completion, the secretary of state shall deliver the
same with the original to the designated representatives of the proponents,
keeping the copy with a record of the action taken thereon.
(II) THE TITLE BOARD SHALL SET ballot titles shall THAT:
(A) be ARE brief; shall
(B) ARE WRITTEN USING ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE, WHICH IS PLAIN
LANGUAGE THAT IS UNDERSTOOD BY THE WIDEST POSSIBLE AUDIENCE;
(C) DO not conflict with those BALLOT TITLES selected for any
petition previously filed for the same election; and shall
(D) be ARE in the form of a question which THAT may be answered
"yes/for" (to vote in favor of the proposed law or constitutional amendment)
or "no/against" (to vote against the proposed law or constitutional
amendment) and which shall THAT unambiguously state STATES the
principle of the provision sought to be added, amended, or repealed.
(e) For measures that reduce state tax revenue through a tax change,
the ballot title must begin INCLUDE LANGUAGE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO
THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY APPEAR ANYWHERE IN THE BALLOT
TITLE: "Shall there be a reduction to the (description of tax) by (the
percentage by which the tax is reduced in the first full fiscal year that the
measure reduces revenue) thereby reducing state revenue, which will reduce
funding for state expenditures that include but are not limited to (the three
largest areas of program expenditure) by an estimated (projected dollar
figure of revenue reduction to the state in the first full fiscal year that the
measure reduces revenue) in tax revenue...?". If the ballot measure specifies
the public services or programs that are to be reduced by the tax change,
those public services or programs must be stated in the ballot title. If the
public services or programs identified in the measure are insufficient to
account for the full dollar value of the tax change in the first full fiscal year
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

that the measure reduces revenue, then the three largest areas of program
expenditure must be stated in the bill title along with the public services or
programs identified in the measure. The estimates reflected in the ballot title
shall not be interpreted as restrictions of the state's budgeting process.
(f) For measures that reduce local district property tax revenue
through a tax change, the ballot title must begin INCLUDE LANGUAGE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY
APPEAR ANYWHERE IN THE BALLOT TITLE: "Shall funding available for
counties, school districts, water districts, fire districts, and other districts
funded, at least in part, by property taxes be impacted by a reduction of
(projected dollar figure of property tax revenue reduction to all districts in
the first full fiscal year that the measure reduces revenue) in property tax
revenue...?". The title board shall exclude any districts whose property tax
revenue would not be reduced by the measure from the measure's ballot
title. The estimates reflected in the ballot title shall not be interpreted as
restrictions of a local district's budgeting process.
(g) (I) For measures that increase tax revenue for any district
through a tax change and specify the public services to be funded by the
increased revenue, THE BALLOT TITLE MUST INCLUDE LANGUAGE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY BE
PLACED ANYWHERE after the language required by section 20 (3)(c) of
article X of the state constitution: the ballot title shall state "in order to
increase or improve levels of public services, including (the public service
specified in the measure)...". For measures that increase tax revenue for any
district through a tax change and do not specify the public services to be
funded by the increased revenue, THE BALLOT TITLE MUST INCLUDE
LANGUAGE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH
MAY APPEAR ANYWHERE after the language required by section 20 (3)(c) of
article X of the state constitution: the ballot title shall state "in order to
increase or improve levels of public services...".
(h) In determining whether a ballot title qualifies as brief for
purposes of section 1-40-102 (10) and subsection (3)(b) SUBSECTION
(3)(b)(II)(A) of this section AND WHETHER A BALLOT TITLE USES
ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION, the language required by subsection (3)(e), (3)(f), (3)(g), or (3)(j)
of this section may not be considered.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

(h.5) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A BALLOT TITLE IS WRITTEN USING
ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE TITLE BOARD MAY CONSIDER WHETHER THE TITLE:
(I) AVOIDS USING LEGAL, TECHNICAL, OR SPECIALIZED TERMINOLOGY
WHEN POSSIBLE;
(II) CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE PRINCIPAL CHANGE IN LAW OR POLICY
PROPOSED BY THE PROPOSED LAW OR CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT;
(III) AVOIDS UNNECESSARY QUALIFIERS, DOUBLE NEGATIVES, AND
OVERLY COMPLEX PHRASING;
(IV) ORGANIZES CLAUSES SO THAT THE EFFECT OF A "YES/FOR" OR
"NO/AGAINST" VOTE IS READILY UNDERSTOOD; AND
(V) PRESENTS NECESSARY INFORMATION WITHIN THE BALLOT TITLE
IN A LOGICAL AND READABLE ORDER.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-106, amend
(3)(b), (3)(f), (3)(g)(I), and (3)(h); add (3)(h.5); and amend as amended
by House Bill 26-1084 (3)(e) as follows:
1-40-106. Title board - meetings - ballot title - initiative and
referendum - definitions - rules.
(3) (b) (I) In setting a title, the title board shall consider the public
confusion that might be caused by misleading titles and shall, whenever
practicable, avoid titles for which the general understanding of the effect of
a "yes/for" or "no/against" vote will be unclear. The title for the proposed
law or constitutional amendment, which shall MUST correctly and fairly
express the true intent and meaning thereof, together with the ballot title and
submission clause, shall MUST be completed, except as otherwise required
by section 1-40-107, within two weeks after the first meeting of the title
board. Immediately upon completion, the secretary of state shall deliver the
same with the original to the designated representatives of the proponents,
keeping the copy with a record of the action taken thereon.
(II) THE TITLE BOARD SHALL SET ballot titles shall THAT:
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

(A) be ARE brief; shall
(B) ARE WRITTEN USING ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE, WHICH IS PLAIN
LANGUAGE THAT IS UNDERSTOOD BY THE WIDEST POSSIBLE AUDIENCE;
(C) DO not conflict with those BALLOT TITLES selected for any
petition previously filed for the same election; and shall
(D) be ARE in the form of a question which THAT may be answered
"yes/for" (to vote in favor of the proposed law or constitutional amendment)
or "no/against" (to vote against the proposed law or constitutional
amendment) and which shall THAT unambiguously state STATES the
principle of the provision sought to be added, amended, or repealed.
(e) For measures that reduce state tax revenue through a tax change,
the ballot title must begin INCLUDE LANGUAGE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO
THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY APPEAR ANYWHERE IN THE BALLOT
TITLE: "Shall there be a reduction to the (description of tax) by (the
percentage by which the tax is reduced in the first full fiscal year that the
measure reduces revenue) thereby reducing state revenue, which will likely
reduce funding for state expenditures that include but are not limited to (the
three largest areas of program expenditure) by an estimated (projected
dollar figure of revenue reduction to the state in the first full fiscal year that
the measure reduces revenue) in tax revenue...?". If the ballot measure
specifies the public services or programs that are to be reduced by the tax
change, those public services or programs must be stated in the ballot title.
If the public services or programs identified in the measure are insufficient
to account for the full dollar value of the tax change in the first full fiscal
year that the measure reduces revenue, then the three largest areas of
program expenditure must be stated in the bill title along with the public
services or programs identified in the measure. The estimates reflected in
the ballot title shall not be interpreted as restrictions of the state's budgeting
process.
(f) For measures that reduce local district property tax revenue
through a tax change, the ballot title must begin INCLUDE LANGUAGE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY
APPEAR ANYWHERE IN THE BALLOT TITLE: "Shall funding available for
counties, school districts, water districts, fire districts, and other districts
funded, at least in part, by property taxes be impacted by a reduction of
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

(projected dollar figure of property tax revenue reduction to all districts in
the first full fiscal year that the measure reduces revenue) in property tax
revenue...?". The title board shall exclude any districts whose property tax
revenue would not be reduced by the measure from the measure's ballot
title. The estimates reflected in the ballot title shall not be interpreted as
restrictions of a local district's budgeting process.
(g) (I) For measures that increase tax revenue for any district
through a tax change and specify the public services to be funded by the
increased revenue, THE BALLOT TITLE MUST INCLUDE LANGUAGE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY
APPEAR ANYWHERE after the language required by section 20 (3)(c) of
article X of the state constitution: the ballot title shall state "in order to
increase or improve levels of public services, including (the public service
specified in the measure)...". For measures that increase tax revenue for any
district through a tax change and do not specify the public services to be
funded by the increased revenue, THE BALLOT TITLE MUST INCLUDE
LANGUAGE SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH MAY APPEAR
ANYWHERE after the language required by section 20 (3)(c) of article X of
the state constitution: the ballot title shall state "in order to increase or
improve levels of public services...".
(h) In determining whether a ballot title qualifies as brief for
purposes of section 1-40-102 (10) and subsection (3)(b) SUBSECTION
(3)(b)(II)(A) of this section AND WHETHER A BALLOT TITLE USES
ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION, the language required by subsection (3)(e), (3)(f), (3)(g), or
(3)(j) of this section may not be considered.
(h.5) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A BALLOT TITLE IS WRITTEN USING
ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE TITLE BOARD MAY CONSIDER WHETHER THE TITLE:
(I) AVOIDS USING LEGAL, TECHNICAL, OR SPECIALIZED TERMINOLOGY
WHEN POSSIBLE;
(II) CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE PRINCIPAL CHANGE IN LAW OR POLICY
PROPOSED BY THE PROPOSED LAW OR CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT;
(III) AVOIDS UNNECESSARY QUALIFIERS, DOUBLE NEGATIVES, AND
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

OVERLY COMPLEX PHRASING;
(IV) ORGANIZES CLAUSES SO THAT THE EFFECT OF A "YES/FOR" OR
"NO/AGAINST" VOTE IS READILY UNDERSTOOD; AND
(V) PRESENTS NECESSARY INFORMATION WITHIN THE BALLOT TITLE
IN A LOGICAL AND READABLE ORDER.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
(b) Section 1 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1084 does
not become law, in which case section 1 takes effect on the applicable
effective date of this act.
(c) Section 2 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1084
becomes law, in which case section 2 takes effect on the applicable
effective date of this act or on the effective date of House Bill 26-1084,
whichever is later.
(2) This act applies to initiative petition drafts submitted to the
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1320

secretary of state for title setting on or after the applicable effective date of
this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1320